Utah statutes.
58-61-302.   Term of license.
(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in
accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by division rule.
(b)  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal cycle by as much as
one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.
(2)  At the time of renewal the licensee shall show satisfactory evidence of
renewal requirements as required under this chapter.
(3)  Each license expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless
renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.
